Arkansas, session 2025, HB1787.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-51-307(e) and (f), concerning the income
tax exemption for retirement or disability benefits, are amended to read as
follows:
(e)(1) The following are exempt from the income tax imposed under this
chapter:
(A) Retirement benefits received by a member of the
uniformed services from any of the uniformed services identified in
subdivision (e)(2) of this section; and
(B) Survivor benefits that are funded by the retirement
pay of a member of the uniformed services;
(C) Retirement benefits received by a retired law
enforcement officer based on his or her service as a law enforcement officer;
and
*JLL222*
03/13/2025 8:15:51 AM JLL222

HB1787
(D) Retirement benefits received by a retired firefighter
based on his or her service as a firefighter.
(2) As used in this subsection,: “member
(A) “Firefighter” means a:
(i) Certified firefighter with a municipal or
volunteer fire department in the state; or
(ii) Firefighter with the Arkansas National Guard;
(B) “Law enforcement officer” means a:
(i) Certified law enforcement officer who is:
(a) A police officer with a municipal police
department in the state;
(b) A county sheriff or deputy sheriff of a
county in the state;
(c) A member of the police force of the
Division of Arkansas State Police;
(d) A member of the uniformed personnel of the
Arkansas Highway Police Division of the Arkansas Department of
Transportation; or
(e) An employee of an agency or department of
the state; or
(v) An officer of a state or local detention
facility in the state; and
(C) “Member of the uniformed services” means a retired
member of any of the following:
(A)(i) The United States Army, the United States
Marine Corps, the United States Navy, the United States Air Force, or the
United States Coast Guard;
(B)(ii) A reserve component of any of the United
States Armed Forces listed in subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this section;
(C)(iii) The National Guard of any state;
(D)(iv) The commissioned regular or reserve corps of
the United States Public Health Service; or
(E)(v) The National Oceanic and Atmospheric
Administration Commissioned Officer Corps.
(f)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (f)(2) of this section, a
taxpayer claiming an exemption under subsection (e) of this section is not
03/13/2025 8:15:51 AM JLL222

HB1787
eligible for an exemption under subsection (a) of this section.
(2) A taxpayer claiming an exemption of less than six thousand
dollars ($6,000) for income from military retirement, law enforcement
retirement, firefighter retirement, or survivor benefits under subsection (e)
of this section may claim as exempt additional retirement benefits under
subsection (a) of this section in an amount equal to the difference between
the exemption claimed under subsection (e) of this section and six thousand
dollars ($6,000).

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective for tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.

























03/13/2025 8:15:51 AM JLL222